Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8091.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-21.2-2, 23-21.2-3 and 23-21.2-4 of the General Laws in Chapter
23-21.2 entitled "Licensing of Youth Camps" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-21.2-2. Requirements for licensing of youth camps.
(a) To be eligible for the issuance or renewal of a youth camp license, the camp shall satisfy
the following requirements:
(1) The location of the camp shall be such as to provide adequate potable water and afford
facilities for obtaining readily available potable water;
(2) Each dwelling unit, building, and structure shall be maintained in good condition,
suitable for the use to which it is intended, and shall present no health or fire hazard as so certified
by the department of health and the state fire marshal or local fire marshal, and if required, as
indicated by a current fire marshal certificate dated within the past year and available on site when
the youth camp is in operation;
(3) There shall be an adequate and competent staff consisting of:
(i) The youth camp director or assistant director, one of whom shall be on site at all times
the camp is in operation;
(ii) Activities specialists;
(iii) Counselors; and
(iv) Maintenance personnel;
(4) Each camp staff member over the age of eighteen (18) years shall be required to obtain

a criminal records background check from the bureau of criminal identification and investigation
division of the state police, local police department, or the office of the attorney general in
accordance with the procedures and standards provided in § 40-13.2-5.1;
(5) All youth camp staff shall be trained, at a minimum, on the camp’s policies and
procedures pertaining to behavioral management and supervision, emergency health and safety
procedures and recognizing, preventing, and reporting child abuse and neglect in accordance with
§ 40-11-3;
(6) All hazardous activities, including, but not limited to, archery, aquatics, horseback
riding, and firearms instruction, shall be supervised by a qualified activities specialist who has
adequate experience and training in such area of specialty;
(7) The staff of a residential and day camp shall at all times include an individual trained
in the administration of first aid as required by the director;
(8) Records of personal data for each camper shall be kept in any reasonable form. The
form shall include:
(i) The camper’s name, age, and address;
(ii) The name, address, and telephone number of the parents or guardian;
(iii) The dates of admission and discharge; and
(iv) Such other information as required by the department; and
(9) Any youth camp licensed under this chapter shall operate only as the type of camp
authorized by such license. Such camps shall not advertise any service they are not equipped or
licensed to offer. The license shall be posted in a conspicuous place at youth camp headquarters
and failure to so post the license shall result in the presumption that the camp is being operated in
violation of this chapter.
(b) The requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply until January 1, 2027.
23-21.2-3. Inspections of facilities.
(a) The department shall inspect or cause to be inspected the facilities to be operated by an
applicant for an original license before the license shall be granted and shall annually thereafter
inspect or cause to be inspected the facilities of all licensees.
(b) The inspection requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply until
January 1, 2027.
23-21.2-4. Rules and regulations.
The department shall promulgate rules and regulations deemed necessary to implement the
purposes of this chapter. Any rules and regulations adopted to implement §§ 22-21.2-2(a) and 23-
21.2-3(a) shall not take effect until January 1, 2027.
LC005322 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005322
========
LC005322 - Page 3 of 4